Utah statutes.
78B-14-701 (Superseded 07/01/15).   Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this state authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage brought under this chapter or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

